Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.053

Supervisor of building and construction safety inspection services—Appointment—Authority—Personnel.

The director of labor and industries shall appoint and deputize an assistant, to be known as the supervisor of building and construction safety inspection services, who shall have authority to perform those duties delegated by the director and by statute.

The director may appoint and employ such inspectors, clerks, and other assistants as may be necessary to carry on building and construction safety inspection services subject to the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW.

[ 1994 c 164 s 7; 1969 ex.s. c 32 s 3.]